Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-523. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning applicability of this subchapter to a prospective purchaser, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1042, § 12. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 125, § 4. For current law, see § 8-7-1101 et seq.

8-7-524. Recycling transactions — Definitions.

The purposes of this section are:

To promote the reuse and recycling of scrap material in Arkansas while protecting human health and the environment;

To promote the goals of the Arkansas Pollution Prevention Act, § 8-10-201 et seq., and related Arkansas legislation intended to encourage recycling;

To create greater equity in the statutory treatment of recycled material versus virgin materials;

To remove the disincentives and impediments to recycling in Arkansas created as an unintended consequence of certain liability provisions contained in this subchapter; and

To incorporate into this subchapter amendments to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, adopted by the United States Congress in 1999 in Pub. L. No. 106-113, thus ensuring that Arkansas law does not contain more stringent provisions than federal law.

As provided in subsections (c)-(f) of this section, a person who arranged for recycling of recyclable material shall not be liable under § 8-7-512(a)(3) or § 8-7-512(a)(4) with respect to the recyclable material.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the liability of a person under § 8-7-512(a)(3) or § 8-7-512(a)(4) with respect to material that is not recyclable material as defined in subsection (c) of this section.

As used in this section, “recyclable material” means scrap paper, scrap plastic, scrap glass, scrap textiles, scrap rubber other than whole tires, scrap metal, or spent lead-acid batteries, spent nickel-cadmium batteries, and other spent batteries, as well as minor amounts of material incident to or adhering to the scrap material as a result of its normal and customary use prior to becoming scrap.

However, “recyclable material” does not include:

Shipping containers of a capacity from thirty liters (30 l) to three thousand liters (3,000 l), whether intact or not, having any hazardous substance, but not metal bits and pieces or hazardous substance that form an integral part of the shipping container, contained on or adhering thereto; or

Any item of material that contains polychlorinated biphenyls at a concentration in excess of fifty parts per million (50 ppm) or any new standard promulgated pursuant to applicable federal laws.

Transactions involving scrap paper, scrap plastic, scrap glass, scrap textiles, or scrap rubber other than whole tires shall be deemed to be arranging for recycling of recyclable material, if the person who arranged for the transaction by selling recyclable material or otherwise arranging for the recycling of recyclable material can demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that all of the following criteria were met at the time of the transaction:

The recyclable material met a commercial specification grade;

A market existed for the recyclable material;

A substantial portion of the recyclable material was made available for use as feedstock for the manufacture of a salable new product;

The recyclable material could have been a replacement or substitute for a virgin raw material, or the product to be made from the recyclable material could have been a replacement or substitute for a product made, in whole or in part, from virgin raw material;

For transactions occurring ninety (90) days or more after the date of enactment of this section, the person exercised reasonable care to determine that the facility where the recyclable material was handled, processed, reclaimed, or otherwise managed by another person, i.e., a consuming facility, was in compliance with substantive, not procedural or administrative, provisions of any federal, state, or local environmental law or regulation or compliance order or decree issued pursuant thereto, applicable to the handling, processing, reclamation, storage, or other management activities associated with recyclable material; and

As used in this subsection, “reasonable care” shall be determined using criteria that include:

The price paid in the recycling transaction;

The ability of the person to detect the nature of the consuming facility's operations concerning its handling, processing, reclamation, or other management activities associated with recyclable material; and

The result of inquiries made to the appropriate federal, state, or local environmental agency regarding the consuming facility's past and current compliance with substantive, not procedural or administrative, provisions of any federal, state, or local environmental law or regulation or compliance order or decree issued pursuant thereto, applicable to the handling, processing, reclamation, storage, or other management activities associated with the recyclable material.

For the purposes of this subsection, a requirement to obtain a permit applicable to the handling, processing, reclamation, or other management activity associated with the recyclable material shall be deemed to be a substantive provision.

Transactions involving scrap metal shall be deemed to be arranging for recycling, if the person who arranged for the transaction by selling recyclable material or otherwise arranging for the recycling of recyclable material can demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that at the time of the transaction the person:

Met the criteria set forth in subsection (d) of this section with respect to the scrap metal;

Was in compliance with any applicable rules or standards regarding the storage, transport, management, or other activities associated with the recycling of scrap metal that the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission promulgates after the enactment of this section and with regard to transactions occurring after the effective date of those rules or standards; and

Did not melt the scrap metal prior to the transaction.

For purposes of subdivision (e)(1)(C) of this section, melting of scrap metal does not include the thermal separation of two (2) or more materials due to differences in their melting points, referred to as “sweating”.

Except for scrap metals that the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the commission excludes from this definition by regulation, as used in this subsection, “scrap metal” means:

Bits and pieces of metal parts, such as bars, turnings, rods, sheets, or wire; or

Metal pieces that may be combined together with bolts or soldering, such as radiators, scrap automobiles, or railroad box cars, which when worn or superfluous can be recycled.

Transactions involving spent lead-acid batteries, spent nickel-cadmium batteries, or other spent batteries shall be deemed to be arranging for recycling, if the person who arranged for the transaction by selling recyclable material or otherwise arranging for the recycling of recyclable material can demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that at the time of the transaction:

The person:

Met the criteria set forth in subsection (d) of this section with respect to the spent lead-acid batteries, spent nickel-cadmium batteries, or other spent batteries, but did not recover the valuable components of such spent lead-acid batteries, spent nickel-cadmium batteries, or other spent batteries; and

With respect to transactions involving lead-acid batteries, was in compliance with applicable federal regulations or standards and Arkansas environmental rules or standards, and any amendments thereto, regarding the storage, transport, management, or other activities associated with the recycling of spent lead-acid batteries;

With respect to transactions involving nickel-cadmium batteries, federal regulations or standards and Arkansas environmental rules or standards were in effect regarding the storage, transport, management, or other activities associated with the recycling of spent nickel-cadmium batteries, and the person was in compliance with applicable regulations, rules, or standards or any amendments thereto; or

With respect to transactions involving other spent batteries, federal regulations or standards and Arkansas environmental rules or standards were in effect regarding the storage, transport, management, or other activities associated with the recycling of those other spent batteries, and the person was in compliance with applicable regulations, rules, or standards or any amendments thereto.

The exemptions set forth in subsections (d)-(f) of this section shall not apply if the person:

Had an objectively reasonable basis to believe at the time of the recycling transaction:

That the recyclable material would not be recycled;

That the recyclable material would be burned as fuel, or for energy recovery or incineration; or

For transactions occurring before ninety (90) days after the date of the enactment of this section, that the consuming facility was not in compliance with a substantive, not procedural or administrative, provision of any federal, state, or local environmental law, rule, or regulation or compliance order or decree issued pursuant thereto, applicable to the handling, processing, reclamation, or other management activities associated with the recyclable material;

Had reason to believe that hazardous substances had been added to the recyclable material for purposes other than processing for recycling; or

Failed to exercise reasonable care with respect to the management and handling of the recyclable material, including adhering to customary industry practices current at the time of the recycling transaction designed to minimize, through source control, contamination of the recyclable material by hazardous substances.

For purposes of this subsection, an objectively reasonable basis for belief shall be determined using criteria that include:

The size of the person's business;

Customary industry practices, including customary industry practices current at the time of the recycling transaction designed to minimize, through source control, contamination of the recyclable material by hazardous substances;

The price paid in the recycling transaction; and

The ability of the person to detect the nature of the consuming facility's operations concerning its handling, processing, reclamation, or other management activities associated with the recyclable material.

For purposes of this subsection, a requirement to obtain a permit applicable to the handling, processing, reclamation, or other management activities associated with recyclable material shall be deemed to be a substantive provision.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the liability of a person under § 8-7-512(a)(1) or § 8-7-512(a)(2).

The commission is authorized to promulgate additional rules concerning this section.

The exemptions provided in this section shall not affect any concluded judicial or administrative action or any pending judicial action initiated by the State of Arkansas before enactment of this section.

Any person who commences an action in contribution against a person who is not liable by operation of this section shall be liable to that person for all reasonable costs of defending that action, including all reasonable attorney's and expert witness fees.

As used in this subsection, “person” does not include an agency, board, commission, or department of the State of Arkansas.

Nothing in this section shall affect:

Liability under any other federal, Arkansas, or local statute, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant to any such statute, including any requirements promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.; or

The ability of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission to promulgate rules under any other statute, including the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Affect any defenses or liabilities of any person to whom subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply; or

Create any presumption of liability against any person to whom subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 449, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 638-643.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Regarding references to “the enactment of this section” in (d)(5), (e)(1)(B), and (g)(1)(A)(iii), Acts 2001, No. 449 became effective August 13, 2001.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e)(1)(B), (f)(1)(B), (f)(2), (f)(3), and (l)(2); inserted “regulations or standards” in (f)(1)(B), (f)(2) and (f)(3); inserted the last occurrence of “rules” in (f)(2) and (f)(3); inserted “rule” in (g)(1)(A)(iii) and (l)(1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (i).

U.S. Code.

The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq. The 1999 amendments referred to in subdivision (a)(5) of this section are codified as 42 U.S.C. § 9627.

8-7-525. Appropriation.

On or after July 1, 2005, any appropriation made payable from the Emergency Response Fund [abolished] shall be made payable from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1824, § 17.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Emergency Response Fund, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 2005, No. 1824, §§ 4 and 18.

Subchapter 6
— Low-Level Radioactive Waste

Cross References.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, § 8-8-201 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-601. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Above-ground facility” means any facility which has a substantial portion of its structure above ground; and

“Low-level radioactive waste” means radioactive material that:

Is not high-level radioactive waste, spent nuclear fuel, or by-product material as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 2014(e)(2); and

The United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, consistent with existing law and in accordance with subdivision (2)(A) of this section, classifies as low-level radioactive waste.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 562, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1987, No. 562, § 1, subdivision (2)(A) of this section read in part: “(as defined in section 11e(2) of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954) (42 U.S.C. 2014(e)(2))”. However, the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, Pub. L. No. 83-703, did not contain a section 11e(2). It did contain a section 11e, which defined “byproduct material”.

Cross References.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, § 8-8-201 et seq.

Nuclear power generally, § 15-10-301 et seq.

8-7-602. Disposal or storage in above-ground facilities.

In the event that low-level radioactive waste is required to be disposed of or stored in the State of Arkansas, the low-level radioactive waste shall be disposed of or stored only in an above-ground facility.

An above-ground facility shall be so designed, constructed, and maintained as to prevent any accidental release of the low-level radioactive waste or any harmful substance in the above-ground facility as a result of flooding, earthquakes, tornadoes, or other occurrences, to permit effective surveillance of the above-ground facility and the low-level radioactive waste in the above-ground facility, and to permit retrievability of any low-level radioactive waste stored in the above-ground facility for testing and other appropriate purposes.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 562, § 2.

8-7-603. Approval and issuance of permits.

Neither the Division of Environmental Quality nor any other agency or authority having the responsibility for approving and issuing permits for facilities for the disposal or storage of low-level radioactive waste in this state shall have the authority to approve or issue a permit for any facility unless the facility will fully comply with the requirements of this subchapter in all respects.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 562, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 101; 2019, No. 910, § 2776.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-604. Compact provisions controlling.

The implementation of this subchapter will not affect Arkansas's continued membership in the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact Commission. If any provision of this subchapter is in conflict with the provisions of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, § 8-8-201 et seq., the provisions of the compact shall be controlling.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 562, § 4.

Subchapter 7
— Federally Listed Hazardous Sites

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 11: Mar. 6, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is urgent that appropriate action be taken to promote and encourage implementation of response actions at federally listed hazardous sites; that this act is designed to promote and encourage appropriate response actions at such sites as soon as possible and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-701. Legislative intent.

The purpose of this subchapter is to encourage response actions at federally listed hazardous sites, to facilitate agreements related to property access and use to implement response actions at federally listed hazardous sites, to discourage activities that interfere with or obstruct such response actions, and to provide for the future use of federally listed hazardous sites after remediation.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 1.

8-7-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Hazardous site” means any geographic area located, in whole or in part, in the State of Arkansas, access to or use of which is determined by the Division of Environmental Quality to be necessary or appropriate to implement a response ordered by the President of the United States;

“Hazardous substance” means:

Any substance designated pursuant to § 311(b)(2)(A) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1321(b)(2)(A);

Any element, compound, mixture, solution, or substance designated pursuant to § 102 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1252;

Any hazardous waste having the characteristics identified under or listed pursuant to § 3001 of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6921, but not including any waste the regulation of which under the Solid Waste Disposal Act has been suspended by act of the United States Congress;

Any toxic pollutant listed under § 307(a) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1317(a);

Any hazardous air pollutant listed under § 112 of the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7412; and

Any imminently hazardous chemical substance or mixture with respect to which the administrator has taken action pursuant to § 7 of the Toxic Substances Control Act, 15 U.S.C. § 2606.

“Hazardous substance” does not include petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof which is not otherwise specifically listed or designated as a hazardous substance under subdivisions (2)(A)(i)-(vi) of this section.

“Hazardous substance” does not include natural gas, natural gas liquids, liquefied natural gas, or synthetic gas usable for fuel, or mixtures of natural gas and such synthetic gas;

“Passive-site owner” means any person or entity owning any interest in any portion of a hazardous site, whether as owner, joint tenant, lessee, mortgagee, licensee, easement holder, mineral owner, or otherwise, and who has not entered into an agreement pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9622 for that hazardous site;

“Response costs” means all amounts of removal or remedial action, including any costs and expenses incurred as a result of contractor delays, and other necessary amounts, including attorney's fees and expenses reasonably incurred by any entity, including, but not limited to, the United States, the State of Arkansas, the governments of any other states, corporations, partnerships, and private citizens to investigate and secure a response action at a hazardous site; and

“Settling party” means any person who has entered into an agreement with the United States pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9622.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 102; 2019, No. 910, § 2777.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (1).

8-7-703. Interference by passive-site owners.

No passive-site owner shall unduly impede or interfere with the efforts of a settling party to carry out an approved response action at a hazardous site.

Any passive-site owner who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be liable for any response costs resulting from such violation.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, §§ 3, 4.

8-7-704. Injunction.

The circuit court of the county in which the hazardous site is located shall have jurisdiction to enjoin any passive-site owner from unduly impeding or interfering with the implementation of a response action at such hazardous site.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 5.

8-7-705. Restrictions on use of hazardous substances.

Construction on or at a hazardous site and the use of such hazardous site for any residential, commercial, manufacturing, industrial, or recreational purposes shall be prohibited unless and until the Division of Environmental Quality issues an order terminating, wholly or partially, such prohibitions. Such order shall be subject to the procedural guidelines set forth in §§ 8-4-212 — 8-4-214 and 8-4-222 — 8-4-229 of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 6; 1999, No. 1164, § 103; 2019, No. 910, § 2778.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-706. Ad valorem tax exemption.

Upon initiation of a response action at a hazardous site, such hazardous site shall be appraised at no value for purposes of any ad valorem taxes levied by any state, county, or local governmental authority unless and until the Division of Environmental Quality issues an order wholly terminating the construction and use prohibitions established by § 8-7-705. This section shall not apply to the interest in such hazardous site owned by any passive-site owner or its successors and assigns that have violated § 8-7-703(a).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 7; 1999, No. 1164, § 104; 2019, No. 910, § 2779.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the first sentence.

8-7-707. Director and officer liability.

No director or officer of a corporation whose sole purpose as stated in its articles of incorporation is to own, implement a response action at, or hold one (1) or more hazardous sites, shall be liable to any person or entity for any action of the corporation reasonably related to the stated purpose of the corporation. This section shall not apply to any action of the corporation resulting from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of a director or officer of said corporation.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 350, § 8.

Subchapter 8
— Regulated Substance Storage Tanks

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 14, provided: “If any provision of this act is found to conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 17: July 1, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the Underground Storage Tank Program created herein in the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989.”

Acts 1991, No. 594, § 5: Mar. 18, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the Regulated Storage Tank Program that this act be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 427 and 436, § 5: Feb. 24, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the effective and efficient administration of the Regulated Storage Tank Program and the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund that this act be given effect immediately. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 1471, § 6: Apr. 10, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 83rd General Assembly that under present law a requirement for Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund eligibility is substantial compliance with applicable federal and state requirements. This eligibility requirement poses two significant problems. First, a storage tank owner or operator found ineligible for the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund reimbursement is in reality penalized tens of thousands of dollars that are typically expended on investigation and/or remediation of petroleum releases. Second, the difficulty specifying the type of conduct that constitutes substantial compliance generates uncertainty as to whether the Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund will be available to owners or operators of such equipment. Consequently, it has been determined that instead of judging trust fund eligibility on the basis of substantial compliance, requiring owners and operators of storage tanks to annually complete and submit to the department self-inspection audits will better enhance environmental protection. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 264, § 6: Mar. 9, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the distribution of federal funds to implement and effectuate the purpose and intent of this act and to carry out other essential governmental services relating to an underground storage tank release detection, prevention, corrective action, and financial responsibility program as required by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 as it exists on January 1, 2007, is contingent upon implementing certain provisions of this act by February 8, 2007; that such federal funds are necessary to continue to provide essential governmental services; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay in the effective date of this act may result in the loss of federal funds which could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-801. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Aboveground storage tank” means any one (1) or a combination of containers, vessels, and enclosures located aboveground, including structures and appurtenances connected to them, whose capacity is greater than one thousand three hundred twenty gallons (1,320 gals.) and not more than forty thousand gallons (40,000 gals.) and that is used to contain or dispense motor fuels, distillate special fuels, or other refined petroleum products.

“Aboveground storage tank” does not include mobile storage tanks used to transport petroleum from one location to another or those used in the production of petroleum or natural gas;

“Adjacent property owner” means any person, other than an owner or operator, owning an interest in any property affected by a release;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“Operator” means any person in control of or having responsibility for the daily operation of an underground storage tank;

“Owner” means:

In the case of an underground storage tank in use on November 8, 1984, or brought into use after November 8, 1984, any person who owns an underground storage tank used for the storage, use, or dispensing of regulated substances; and

In the case of any underground storage tank in use before November 8, 1984, but no longer in use on November 8, 1984, any person who owned such underground storage tank immediately before the discontinuation of its use.

“Owner” does not include any person who, without participation in the management of an underground storage tank, holds indicia of ownership primarily to protect a security interest in the underground storage tank;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company or trust, venture, or municipal, state, or federal government or agency, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Petroleum” means petroleum, including crude oil or any fraction thereof, that is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure, sixty degrees Fahrenheit (60° F) and fourteen and seven-tenths pounds (14.7 lbs.) per square inch absolute;

“Regulated substance” means:

Any substance defined in § 101(14) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. § 9601(14), but not including any substance regulated as a hazardous waste under Subtitle C of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6921 et seq.; and

Petroleum;

“Release” means any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing from an underground storage tank into groundwater, surface water, or subsurface soils.

“Release” does not include releases that are permitted or authorized by the Division of Environmental Quality or by federal law;

“Release site property owner” means a person, other than an owner or operator, that owns an interest in a property on which a release has occurred;

“Secondary containment” means a release prevention and release detection system for an underground storage tank or piping, or both, that provides an inner barrier and an outer barrier and an interstitial space between the two (2) barriers for monitoring to detect the presence of a leak or release of regulated substances from the underground storage tank or piping, or both;

“Storage tank” means an aboveground storage tank or underground storage tank as defined in this subchapter; and

“Underground storage tank” means any one (1) or combination of tanks, including underground pipes connected thereto, which is or has been used to contain an accumulation of regulated substances, and the volume of which, including the volume of the underground pipes connected thereto, is ten percent (10%) or more beneath the surface of the ground.

“Underground storage tank” does not include any:

Farm or residential tank of one thousand one hundred gallons (1,100 gals.) or less capacity used for storing motor fuel for noncommercial purposes;

Tank used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premises where stored;

Septic tank;

Pipeline facility, including gathering lines, regulated under:

The Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act of 1968, 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.; and

The Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979;

Surface impoundment, pit, pond, or lagoon;

Storm water or wastewater collection system;

Flow-through process tank;

Liquid trap or associated gathering lines directly related to oil or gas production and gathering operations;

Storage tank situated in an underground area, such as a basement, cellar, mineworking, drift, shaft, or tunnel, if the storage tank is situated upon or above the surface of the floor; or

Pipes connected to any tank that is described in subdivisions (14)(B)(i)-(ix) of this section.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 172, § 1; 1993, No. 810, § 1; 1995, No. 427, § 1; 1995, No. 436, § 1; 1999, No. 600, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 105; 2001, No. 1471, § 1; 2007, No. 264, § 1; 2009, No. 282, § 1; 2013, No. 1509, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2780, 2781.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment inserted (11) and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “(14)” for “(13)” in present (14)(J).

The 2009 amendment deleted (13), which defined “storage tank self-inspection audit,” redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly, and substituted “(13)” for “(14)” in (13)(J).

The 2013 amendment inserted (11).

The 2019 amendment repealed (4); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in (10)(B).

U.S. Code.

The Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Act of 1979, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 49 U.S.C. § 60101 et seq.